Kansas, session 2025-2026, SB99.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Kansas:
Section 1. (a) On or before June 30, 2025, the head of each state
agency and the director of the budget shall consult and jointly certify to the
secretary of administration director of accounts and reports the number of
vacant positions in each such state agency paid from appropriations from
the state general fund that have been vacant for more than 180 calendar
days as of June 30, 2025. Upon receipt of each such certification, the
secretary of administration shall abolish the certified vacant positions on
July 1, 2025. Such abolished positions shall be deleted from the budget
documents and reports prepared by the director of the budget, the governor
or the legislative research department, including all related legislative
reports and measures submitted to the legislature.
(b) On July 1, 2025, the amount in each account of the state general
fund of each state agency that is appropriated for the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2026, by any appropriation act of the 2025 regular session of the
legislature, and that is budgeted for payment of salaries and wages,
including associated fringe benefits, of such abolished vacant positions, as
certified by the director of the budget to the director of accounts and
reports for fiscal year 2026, is hereby lapsed from each such account.
When the director of the budget transmits each such certification to the
director of accounts and reports pursuant to this section, the director of the
budget shall transmit a copy of such certification to the director of
legislative research.
(c) As used in this section, "state agency" means any state agency
named in an appropriation act of the 2025 regular session of the
legislature.
Sec. 2. This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its
publication in the Kansas register.